South Dakota, session 2026, HB1002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 3-9:
Notwithstanding §§ 3-9-2 to 3-9-2.2, inclusive, the Department of Public Safety
shall establish a maximum daily meal allowance for wildland fire employees and fire
suppression forces authorized by §§ 34-35-20, 41-20A-8, 41-20A-10, and 41-20A-12,
while performing duties on any uncontrolled fire within the Black Hills Forest Fire Protection
District, or outside the District if the Governor has declared an emergency pursuant to
§ 34-48A-5 or 41-20A-8. The amount may not exceed the current United States General
Services Administration per diem rate for South Dakota. The department shall publish the
maximum daily meal allowance to be effective as of October first each year. The daily
meal allowance applies only to meals that are ordered and distributed in a manner
approved by the department.

26.401.12 2 1002
An Act to revise the daily meal allowance for wildland fire employees and fire suppression
forces in certain circumstances.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1002
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1002 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1002 ENROLLED